Utah statutes.
78B-5-513.   Exemption provisions applicable in bankruptcy proceedings.

No individual may exempt from the property of the estate in any bankruptcy proceeding the property specified in Subsection (d) of Section 522 of the Bankruptcy Reform Act (Public Law 95-598), except as expressly permitted under this part.

